Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1105
Election contest; bond.

The petitioner shall file in the proper court within ten days after filing of the petition a bond with security to be approved by the clerk of the court conditioned to pay all costs in case the election is confirmed.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 348;

Laws 2018, LB744, § 2.

Cost bond must be filed within ten days after filing of complaint contesting election. Sutton v. Anderson, 176 Neb. 543, 126 N.W.2d 836 (1964).